apertium-zab.zab.lexd
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!                                                                         !!!
#!!            V A L L E Y  Z A P O T E C  T R A N S D U C E R              !!!
#!!                                                                         !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

#=============================================================================!
#                         Verb Morphotactics                                  !
#=============================================================================!

PATTERNS

Nouns
Verbs
Punctuation
Numerals

NP-Stems(1) [<np>:] NP-Stems(3):                 # ! Orth/Simp
NP-Stems(1):NP-Stems(2) [<np>:] NP-Stems(3):     # ! Orth/Dict

Prep-Stems(1) [<pr>:]                            # ! Orth/Simp
Prep-Stems(1):Prep-Stems(2) [<pr>:]              # ! Orth/Dict

Prep-Stems-WPron(1) [<pr>:] Prn-Bound(1)                     # ! Orth/Simp
Prep-Stems-WPron(1):Prep-Stems-WPron(2) [<pr>:] Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2) # ! Orth/Dict

Det-Stems(1) [<det>:] Det-Stems(3):              # ! Orth/Simp
Det-Stems(1):Det-Stems(2) [<det>:] Det-Stems(3): # ! Orth/Dict

Postdet-Stems(1) [<postdet>:] Postdet-Stems(3):  # ! Orth/Simp
Postdet-Stems(1):Postdet-Stems(2) [<postdet>:] Postdet-Stems(3):  # ! Orth/Dict

Adv-Stems(1) [<adv>:]                            # ! Orth/Simp
Adv-Stems(1):Adv-Stems(2) [<adv>:]               # ! Orth/Dict

Adv-Stems-Itg(1) [<adv><itg>:]                   # ! Orth/Simp
Adv-Stems-Itg(1):Adv-Stems-Itg(2) [<adv><itg>:]  # ! Orth/Dict

Adj-Stems(1) [<adj>:]                            # ! Orth/Simp
Adj-Stems(1):Adj-Stems(2) [<adj>:]               # ! Orth/Dict

Adj-Stems(1) [<adj>:] Prn-Bound(1)               # ! Orth/Simp
Adj-Stems(1):Adj-Stems(2) [<adj>:] Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2) # ! Orth/Dict

Ij-Stems(1) [<ij>:]                              # ! Orth/Simp
Ij-Stems(1):Ij-Stems(2) [<ij>:]                  # ! Orth/Dict

Mod-Stems(1) [<mod>:]                            # ! Orth/Simp
Mod-Stems(1):Mod-Stems(2) [<mod>:]               # ! Orth/Dict

Pronouns(1) [<prn>:] Pronouns(3):                # ! Orth/Simp
Pronouns(1):Pronouns(2) [<prn>:] Pronouns(3):    # ! Orth/Dict

Conjunctions(1) Conjunctions(3):                 # ! Orth/Simp
Conjunctions(1):Conjunctions(2) Conjunctions(3): # ! Orth/Dict

Number-Stems(1) [<num>:]                         # ! Orth/Simp
Number-Stems(1):Number-Stems(2) [<num>:]         # ! Orth/Dict

# For light verb constructions, with runy

Aux(1) [<aux>:]                                  # ! Orth/Simp
Aux(1):Aux(2) [<aux>:]                           # ! Orth/Dict

Neg-Words


PATTERN Verbs

# Regular verbs

#:Aspect V-Stems(1) :V-Extender(1) :V-Neg(1) :Prn-Bound(1) [<v>:] V-Stems(3): V-Extender(1): Aspect: V-Neg(1): Prn-Bound(1):  # ! Orth/Simp
( :Aspect ( V-Stems(1) [<v>:] V-Stems(3): ) V-Extender(1)? Aspect: ) V-Neg(1)? Prn-Bound(1)  # ! Orth/Simp

#:Aspect V-Stems(1):V-Stems(2) :V-Extender(2) :V-Neg(2) :Prn-Bound(2) [<v>:] V-Stems(3): V-Extender(2): Aspect: V-Neg(2): Prn-Bound(2):  # ! Orth/Dict
( :Aspect ( V-Stems(1):V-Stems(2) [<v>:] V-Stems(3): ) V-Extender(2)? Aspect: ) V-Neg(2)? Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2)   # ! Orth/Dict

# Irregular verbs

# FIXME: expand to both orthographies
#:Aspect[nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1)[nonp1pl,nonperf] :V-Extender(1) :V-Neg(1) :Prn-Bound(1)[nonp1pl] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(1): Aspect: V-Neg(1): Prn-Bound(1)[nonp1pl]:
#:Aspect[nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1)[-nonp1pl,nonperf] :V-Extender(1) :V-Neg(1) :Prn-Bound(1)[-nonp1pl] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(1): Aspect: V-Neg(1): Prn-Bound(1)[-nonp1pl]:
#:Aspect[-nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1)[nonp1pl,-nonperf] :V-Extender(1) :V-Neg(1) :Prn-Bound(1)[nonp1pl] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(1): Aspect: V-Neg(1): Prn-Bound(1)[nonp1pl]:
#:Aspect[-nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1)[-nonp1pl,-nonperf] :V-Extender(1) :V-Neg(1) :Prn-Bound(1)[-nonp1pl] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(1): Aspect: V-Neg(1): Prn-Bound(1)[-nonp1pl]:
:Aspect[nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1)[nonp1pl,nonperf] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(1)? Aspect: V-Neg(1)? Prn-Bound(1)[nonp1pl]      # ! Orth/Simp
:Aspect[nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1)[-nonp1pl,nonperf] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(1)? Aspect: V-Neg(1)? Prn-Bound(1)[-nonp1pl]      # ! Orth/Simp
:Aspect[-nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1)[nonp1pl,-nonperf] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(1)? Aspect: V-Neg(1)? Prn-Bound(1)[nonp1pl]      # ! Orth/Simp
:Aspect[-nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1)[-nonp1pl,-nonperf] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(1)? Aspect: V-Neg(1)? Prn-Bound(1)[-nonp1pl]      # ! Orth/Simp


:Aspect[nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1):V-Stems-Irreg(2)[nonp1pl,nonperf] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(2)? Aspect: V-Neg(2)? Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2)[nonp1pl]      # ! Orth/Dict
:Aspect[nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1):V-Stems-Irreg(2)[-nonp1pl,nonperf] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(2)? Aspect: V-Neg(2)? Prn-Bound(1)[-nonp1pl]:Prn-Bound(2)[-nonp1pl]      # ! Orth/Dict
:Aspect[-nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1):V-Stems-Irreg(2)[nonp1pl,-nonperf] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(2)? Aspect: V-Neg(2)? Prn-Bound(1)[nonp1pl]:Prn-Bound(2)[nonp1pl]      # ! Orth/Dict
:Aspect[-nonperf] V-Stems-Irreg(1):V-Stems-Irreg(2)[-nonp1pl,-nonperf] [<v>:] V-Stems-Irreg(3): V-Extender(2)? Aspect: V-Neg(2)? Prn-Bound(1)[-nonp1pl]:Prn-Bound(2)[-nonp1pl]      # ! Orth/Dict


V-Stems-IrregAspect(1) [<v>:] V-Stems-IrregAspect(3): V-Extender(1)? V-Neg(1)? Prn-Bound(1)  # ! Orth/Simp
V-Stems-IrregAspect(1):V-Stems-IrregAspect(2) [<v>:] V-Stems-IrregAspect(3): V-Extender(2)? V-Neg(2)? Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2)  # ! Orth/Dict

V-Copula(1) [<cop>:] V-Copula(3): V-Extender(1)? V-Neg(1)? Prn-Bound(1)[usedWcop]  # ! Orth/Simp
V-Copula(2) [<cop>:] V-Copula(3): V-Extender(2)? V-Neg(2)? Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2)[usedWcop]  # ! Orth/Dict


PATTERN Nouns

# Bare nouns
N-Stems(1) [<n>:]               # Orth/Simp
N-Stems(1):N-Stems(2) [<n>:]    # Orth/Dict

# Possessed nouns
:N-Poss(1) N-Stems(1)[regPoss] [<n>:] N-Poss(3): Prn-Bound(1)             # Orth/Simp
:N-Poss(2) N-Stems(1):N-Stems(2)[regPoss] [<n>:] N-Poss(3): Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2)  # Orth/Dict

# Inherently possessed nouns
N-Stems-Possessed(1) [<n><px>:] Prn-Bound(1)                         # Orth/Simp
N-Stems-Possessed(1):N-Stems-Possessed(2) [<n><px>:] Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2)    # Orth/Dict


PATTERN Neg-Words

[ queity<adv>:queity ] V-Neg Prn-Bound(1)   # Orth/Simp
[ queity<adv>:quëity ] V-Neg Prn-Bound(1)   # Orth/Simp ! Dir/LR
[ queity<adv>:queʼity ] V-Neg Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2)  # Orth/Dict
[ queity<adv>:quëʼity ] V-Neg Prn-Bound(1):Prn-Bound(2)  # Orth/Dict ! Dir/LR


LEXICON Aspect[nonperf]

<hab>:r>                    # habitual
<perf>[-nonperf]:{B}>[-nonperf]     # perfective
<perf>[-nonperf]:b>[-nonperf]       # perfective  Dir/LR  Orth/SJGZ
<prog>:ca{y}>               # progressive
<irre>:{g}{Y}>              # irrealis

LEXICON N-Poss(3)

# FIXME: deal with irregulars, e.g. xyecw/x꞉yèeʼcw for becw
x>     x꞉>     <px>    # for adding pronominal possession to Ns FIXME: CHECK(2)


LEXICON Prn-Bound(2)[nonp1pl,usedWcop]           # FIXME

+a<prn><pers><p1><sg>[-usedWcop]:>a[-usedWcop]         +aʼ<prn><pers><p1><sg>[-usedWcop]:>aʼ[-usedWcop]
+ën<prn><pers><p1><pl>[-nonp1pl]:>{u}ën[-nonp1pl]      +ëhnn<prn><pers><p1><pl>[-nonp1pl]:>{u}ëhnn[-nonp1pl]

+u<prn><pers><p2><infm><sg>[-usedWcop]:>u[-usedWcop]   +ùuʼ<prn><pers><p2><infm><sg>[-usedWcop]:>ùuʼ[-usedWcop]
+yu<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg>:>yu          +yuuʼ<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg>:>yuuʼ
+yëbu<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg>:>yëbu      +yëbuuʼ<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg>:>yëbuuʼ   # ! Dir/LR
+ad<prn><pers><p2><infm><pl>:>ad         +ad<prn><pers><p2><infm><pl>:>ad      # FIXME: CHECK(2)
+yuad<prn><pers><p2><frm><pl>:>yuad      +yùad<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg>:>yùad
+yëbuad<prn><pers><p2><frm><pl>:>yëbuad  +yëbùad<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg>:>yëbùad   # ! Dir/LR

+ëng<prn><pers><p3><prox><sg>:>{u}ëng    +ëng<prn><pers><p3><prox><sg>:>{u}ëng
+i<prn><pers><p3><dist><sg>:>{u}i        +i<prn><pers><p3><dist><sg>:>{u}ih
+ëb<prn><pers><p3><resp><sg>:>{u}ëb      +ëb<prn><pers><p3><resp><sg>:>{u}ëhb   # FIXME: CHECK(2)
+ëm<prn><pers><p3><anml><sg>:>{u}ëm      +ëm<prn><pers><p3><anml><sg>:>{u}ëhm   # FIXME: CHECK(2)
+azh<prn><pers><p3><fam><sg>:>azh        +azh<prn><pers><p3><fam><sg>:>azh       # FIXME: CHECK(2)
+iny<prn><pers><p3><rev><sg>:>{u}iny     +iny<prn><pers><p3><rev><sg>:>{u}iny    # FIXME: CHECK(2), (1): iny/ni

+ëng<prn><pers><p3><prox><pl>:>rëng      +ëng<prn><pers><p3><prox><pl>:>rëng    # FIXME: CHECK(2)
+i<prn><pers><p3><dist><pl>:>ri          +i<prn><pers><p3><dist><pl>:>rih      # FIXME: CHECK(2)
+ëb<prn><pers><p3><resp><pl>:>rëb        +ëb<prn><pers><p3><resp><pl>:>rëhb    # FIXME: CHECK(2)
+ëb<prn><pers><p3><resp><pl>:>deb        +ëb<prn><pers><p3><resp><pl>:>deb     # Dir/LR  Orth/SJGZ
+ëm<prn><pers><p3><anml><pl>:>rëm        +ëhm<prn><pers><p3><anml><pl>:>rëhm    # FIXME: CHECK(2)
+azh<prn><pers><p3><fam><pl>:>razh       +azh<prn><pers><p3><fam><pl>:>razh     # FIXME: CHECK(2)
+iny<prn><pers><p3><rev><pl>:>riny       +iny<prn><pers><p3><rev><pl>:>riny     # FIXME: CHECK(2)

[perf]:[perf]                           :
:                                       :

LEXICON Pronouns(3)        # Free pronouns

tu           tu               <itg>   # "who"
xi           xi               <itg>   # "what"

naa          nàaʼ             <pers><p1><sg> # "I"

danoën:danoën dannooh-ëhnn:dannooh-ëhnn  <pers><p1><pl> # "we"
danoën:danuën dannooh-ëhnn:dannuuh-ëhnn  <pers><p1><pl> # "we"  ! Dir/LR

liu          lìuʼ             <pers><p2><infm><sg>  # "you (sg, informal)"
laad         làaʼ-ahd         <pers><p2><infm><pl>  # "you (pl, informal)"
yu           yuʼuuʼ           <pers><p2><frm><sg>   # "you (sg, formal)"
yu:yëbu      yuʼuuʼ:yəbuʼuuʼ  <pers><p2><frm><sg>   # "you (sg, formal)" ! Dir/LR
yuad         yùad             <pers><p2><frm><pl>   # "you (pl, formal)"
yuad:yëbuad  yuad:yëbùad      <pers><p2><frm><pl>   # "you (pl, formal)" ! Dir/LR

lai          laʼàiʼ           <pers><p3><dist><sg>  # "he/she/it (distal)" ! Dir/LR
lai          laʼài            <pers><p3><dist><sg>  # "he/she/it (distal)" ! Dir/LR
lai          laʼai            <pers><p3><dist><sg>  # "he/she/it (distal)"
laëng        laʼa-ëng         <pers><p3><prox><sg>  # "he/she/it (proximal)"
laëb         làaʼ-ëhb         <pers><p3><resp><sg>  # "he/she/it (respectful)"
laëm         làaʼ-ëhmm        <pers><p3><anml><sg>  # "he/she/it (animal)"

lari         làaʼri           <pers><p3><dist><pl>  # "they/them (distal)"
larëng       làaʼrëng         <pers><p3><prox><pl>  # "they/them (proximal)"
larëb        làaʼrëhb         <pers><p3><resp><pl>  # "they/them (respectful)"
larëb        laadeb           <pers><p3><resp><pl>  # "they/them (respectful)" ! Dir/LR  Orth/SJGZ
larëm        làaʼrëhmm        <pers><p3><anml><sg>  # "they/them (animal)"


ni           nih              <rel>                 # "who/that/which, the one who/that/which"

LEXICON Conjunctions(3)

chi          chih             <cnjsub>              # "when"
chiru        chiruʼ           <cnjcoo>              # "and; but; then"
nyec         nyèeʼc           <cnjcoo>              # "neither .../nor ..."
o            o                <cnjcoo>              # "or"
per          pehr             <cnjcoo>              # "but"
tyen         tyeʼnn           <cnjsub>              # "because; so that"
zicy\ ni\ na ziʼcy\ nih\ nàa  <cnjsub>              # "like, namely"


LEXICON V-Neg(2)            # FIXME        

<neg>:>d{I}                 <neg>:>d{I}ʼ
#:                           :

# Some other adverbials can come before(?) the negative one
# so at some point we could treat these all as adverbials,
# but would need two slots
# slot 1:
#+di<adv>:>d{I}
# slot 2:
#+cas<adv>:>cas(?)
#+dux<adv>:>dux(?)
